Utah statutes.
72-5-309.   Acceptance of rights-of-way -- Notice of acknowledgment
required.
(1)  The governor or the governor's designee may assess whether the grant of
the R.S. 2477 has been accepted with regard to any right-of-way so as to vest
title of the right-of-way in the state and the applicable political
subdivision as provided for in Section 72-5-103.
(2)  If the governor or governor's designee concludes that the grant has been
accepted as to any right-of-way, the governor or a designee shall issue a
notice of acknowledgment of the acceptance of the R.S. 2477 grant as to that
right-of-way.
(3)  A notice of acknowledgment of the R.S. 2477 grant shall include:
(a)  a statement of reasons for the acknowledgment;
(b)  a general description of the right-of-way or rights-of-way subject to the
notice of acknowledgment, including the county in which it is located, and
notice of where a center-line description derived from Global Positioning
System data may be viewed or obtained;
(c)  a statement that the owner of the servient estate in the land over which
the right-of-way or rights-of-way subject to the notice runs or any person
with a competing dominant estate ownership claim may file a petition with the
district court for a decision regarding the correctness or incorrectness of
the acknowledgment; and
(d)  a statement of the time limit provided in Section 72-5-310 for filing a
petition.
(4) (a) (i) The governor or the governor's designee may record a notice of
acknowledgment, and any supporting affidavit, map, or other document
purporting to establish or affect the state's property interest in the right-
of-way or rights-of-way, in the office of the county recorder in the county
where the right-of-way or rights-of-way exist.
(ii) (A)  A notice of acknowledgment recorded in the county recorder's office
is not required to be accompanied by a paper copy of the center-line
description.
(B)  A paper copy of each center-line description together with the notice of
acknowledgment shall be placed in the state archives created in Section
63A-12-101 and made available to the public upon request in accordance with
Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.
(C)  An electronic copy of the center-line description identified in a notice
of acknowledgment shall be available upon request at:
(I)  the county recorder's office; or
(II)  the Automated Geographic Reference Center created in Section 63F-1-506.
(b)  A notice of acknowledgment recorded in the county recorder's office is
conclusive evidence of acceptance of the R.S. 2477 grant upon:
(i)  expiration of the 60-day period for filing a petition under Section
72-5-310 without the filing of a petition; or
(ii)  a final court decision that the notice of acknowledgment was not
incorrect.
